Hawaii, session 2026, HB2178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The purpose of this Act is to build a foundation of respect and love for the heritage of the State and the United States of America by facilitating the recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance and Hawaii Ponoi in public elementary schools. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I, subpart A, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-    Pledge of allegiance; Hawaii ponoi.  (a) Each public school with students in grade kindergarten, grade six, or any intervening grade shall authorize the school's faculty and staff to provide, on a daily basis, time and space for students to recite the pledge of allegiance and Hawaii ponoi; provided that: (1)  No public school student shall be compelled, against the student's objections or the objections of the student's parent or guardian, to recite the pledge of allegiance or Hawaii ponoi or stand during the recitation of the pledge of allegiance or Hawaii ponoi in any classroom or activity of the public school; (2)  No public school teacher or staff member shall admonish, discipline, or harass a student based on the student's participation or non-participation in a recitation of the pledge of allegiance or Hawaii ponoi in any classroom or activity of the public school; and (3)  No public school teacher or staff member shall be admonished, disciplined, or harassed for either deciding or declining to lead students in a recitation of the pledge of allegiance or Hawaii ponoi in any classroom or activity of the public school. (b) In addition to the pledge of allegiance and Hawaii ponoi, schools may encourage the recitation of other songs or poems that relate to national or state history, culture, and traditions and evoke pride in the nation and state. (c) A copy of this section shall be posted in a conspicuous location at each public school that is subject to this section. (d)  The department shall adopt rules under chapter 91 to carry out the purposes of this section." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________